Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-745
Effect of registration for modification.

A tribunal of this state may enforce a child support order of another state registered for purposes of modification, in the same manner as if the order had been issued by a tribunal of this state, but the registered support order may be modified only if the requirements of section 42-746 or 42-747.01 have been met.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 45;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 81;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 43.